Utah statutes.
31A-22-608.   Reinstatement of individual or franchise accident and health
insurance policies.
(1)  Every individual or franchise accident and health insurance policy shall
contain a provision which reads as follows:
"REINSTATEMENT: If any renewal premium is not paid within the time granted the
insured for payment, a subsequent acceptance of premium by the insurer or by
any agent duly authorized by the insurer to accept the premium, without also
requiring an application for reinstatement, shall reinstate the policy.
However, if the insurer or agent requires an application for reinstatement and
issues a conditional receipt for the premium tendered, the policy shall be
reinstated upon approval of this application from the insurer or, lacking this
approval, upon the 45th day following the date of the conditional receipt,
unless the insurer has previously notified the insured in writing of its
disapproval of the application.  The reinstated policy shall cover only loss
resulting from such accidental injury as may be sustained after the date of
reinstatement and loss due to such sickness as may begin more than 10 days
after that date.  In all other respects the insured and insurer have the same
rights under the reinstated policy as they had under the policy immediately
before the due date of the defaulted premium, subject to any provisions
endorsed on or attached to this policy in connection with the reinstatement.
Any premium accepted in connection with a reinstatement shall be applied to a
period for which premium has not been previously paid, but not to any period
more than 60 days prior to the date of reinstatement."
(2)  The last sentence of the provision set forth in Subsection (1) may be
omitted from any policy that the insured has the right to continue in force
subject to its terms by the timely payment of premiums until at least age 50,
or in the case of a policy issued after age 44, for at least five years from
its date of issue.
